Washington statutes.
RCW 38.08.050

Governor may order out unorganized militia.

In event of, or imminent danger of, war, insurrection, rebellion, invasion, tumult, riot, resistance to law or process or breach of the peace, if the governor shall have ordered into active service all of the available forces of the organized militia of Washington and shall consider them insufficient in number to properly accomplish the purpose, he or she may then in addition order out the unorganized militia or such portion thereof as he may deem necessary, and cause them to perform such military duty as the circumstances may require.

[ 1989 c 19 s 8; 1943 c 130 s 9; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 8603-9. Prior: 1917 c 107 s 9; 1909 c 134 s 17; 1903 c 155 s 15; 1895 c 108 s 112.]